Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as "Rain's Law".


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1484 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.229-8 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As part of the comprehensive, integrated curriculum for
substance abuse programs provided in Section 1210.229-5 of Title 70
of the Oklahoma Statutes, each school district shall annually
provide research-based instruction related to fentanyl abuse
prevention and drug poisoning awareness to students in grades six
through twelve.
B. The instruction required by this section shall include:
1. Suicide prevention;
2. Prevention of the abuse of and addiction to fentanyl;
3. Awareness of local school and community resources and how to
access those resources; and
4. Health education that includes information about substance
use and abuse of fentanyl, including youth substance use and abuse
of fentanyl.
C. The instruction required by this section may be provided by
an organization or an employee or agent of an organization that is:
1. A public or private institution of higher education;
2. A library;
3. A community service organization;
4. A religious organization;
5. A local public health agency; or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1484 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. An organization employing mental health professionals.
D. The State Board of Education shall identify and adopt
curriculum standards for fentanyl awareness instruction that reflect
the areas of instruction listed in subsection B of this section.
The standards shall be incorporated into the appropriate health
standards for grades six through twelve.
E. The State Department of Education shall provide resources to
assist schools and teachers in providing instruction on fentanyl
awareness.
F. Any school district that offers a health education class in
grades six through twelve shall include fentanyl awareness
curriculum in the drug awareness unit.
G. To educate students about the dangers posed by fentanyl and
the risks of fentanyl poisoning, including overdose, the Governor
shall designate a week to be known as Fentanyl Poisoning Awareness
Week in public schools. Fentanyl Poisoning Awareness Week shall be
in correlation with National Red Ribbon Week. Fentanyl Poisoning
Awareness Week may include age-appropriate instruction, including
instruction on the prevention of the abuse of and addiction to
fentanyl, as determined by each school district.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1484 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
April 15, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1484 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)